District of Columbia statutes.
29A-501

Transferred

Definitions.

Transferred.

D.C. Law 11-28, §§ 2 through 5 were recodified as D.C Code §§ 36-501 through 36-504. D.C. Law 11-28, §§ 2 through 5 were recodified as D.C Code §§ 36-501 through 36-504.